Maryland, session 2025, HB1429.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–233(d) and (e) of Article – Human Services of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 9–233(e) and (f), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Human Services
9–233.
(a) (1) In this section[, “youth] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “CRIMINAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE
INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(3) “YOUTH services bureau” means a community–based entity that is
operated:
[(1)] (I) to provide community–oriented delinquency prevention, youth
suicide prevention, drug and alcohol abuse prevention, and youth development;
[(2)] (II) to ameliorate conditions that contribute to delinquency, youth
suicide, drug and alcohol abuse, and family disruption; and
[(3)] (III) to function as an advocate of youth needs.
(D) (1) A YOUTH SERVICES BUREAU MAY APPLY TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY FOR A STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
FOR AN EMPLOYEE, A VOLUNTEER, OR AN INTERN OF THE BUREAU.
(2) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE BUREAU SHALL SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY:
(I) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A
FORMAT APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION;
(II) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE
FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A FEDERAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK; AND

HOUSE BILL 1429 3
(III) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS.
(3) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE
CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO
THE BUREAU AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(4) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(II) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(III) SHALL BE USED ONLY FOR THE EMPLOYMENT AND
VOLUNTEERING PURPOSES AUTHORIZED BY THIS SECTION.
(5) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(6) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO
THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BUREAU AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.